Utah statutes.
70A-3-111.   Place of payment.
Except as otherwise provided for items in Title 70A, Chapter 4, Uniform
Commercial Code -- Bank Deposits and Collections, an instrument is payable at
the place of payment stated in the instrument.  If no place of payment is
stated, an instrument is payable at the address of the drawee or maker stated
in the instrument.  If no address is stated, the place of payment is the place
of business of the drawee or maker.  If a drawee or maker has more than one
place of business, the place of payment is any place of business of the drawee
or maker chosen by the person entitled to enforce the instrument.  If the
drawee or maker has no place of business, the place of payment is the
residence of the drawee or maker.
